Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.96, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04475 62J.96 ACCESS TO 340B DRUGS. Subd. 3. Expiration. This section expires July 1, 2027.